Washington statutes.
RCW 35.63.160

Regulation of manufactured homes—Definitions.

(1) A "designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home constructed after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal requirements for manufactured homes, which:

(a) Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b) Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of nominal 3:12 pitch; and

(c) Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(2) "New manufactured home" means any manufactured home required to be titled under Title 46 RCW, which has not been previously titled to a retail purchaser, and is not a "used mobile home" as defined in RCW 82.45.032(2).

(3) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local standards which differ from the designated manufactured home or new manufactured home as described in this section, except that the term "designated manufactured home" and "new manufactured home" shall not be used except as defined in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

[ 2004 c 256 s 5; 1988 c 239 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2004 c 256: See notes following RCW 35.21.684.